Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.020

Private metal property or nonferrous metal property—Records required. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing business in this state shall produce wherever that business is conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving private metal property or nonferrous metal property. This record must be written in the English language, documented on a standardized form or in electronic form, and contain the following information:

(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;

(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business in the transaction;

(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the private metal property or nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the private metal property or nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the seller's government-issued picture identification card;

(h) A description of the predominant types of private metal property or nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction, utilizing the institute of scrap recycling industries' generally accepted terminology, and including weight, quantity, or volume; and

(i) For every transaction specifically involving a catalytic converter that has been removed from a vehicle, documentation indicating that the private metal property in the seller's possession is the result of the seller replacing private metal property from a vehicle registered in the seller's name.

(2) For every transaction that involves private metal property or nonferrous metal property, every scrap metal business doing business in the state shall require the person with whom a transaction is being made to sign a declaration. The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record required under subsection (1) of this section, or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following:

"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property."

The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.

(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is conducted for five years following the date of the transaction.

[ 2022 c 221 s 3; 2013 c 322 s 5; 2008 c 233 s 2; 2007 c 377 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 221: "The legislature finds that rates of catalytic converter theft have rapidly increased statewide and nationwide, due in part to existing challenges with accurately identifying stolen catalytic converters. The legislature further finds that victims of catalytic converter theft often incur costs that far exceed the monetary value of the catalytic converters themselves. The legislature further finds that catalytic converter theft is a multifaceted issue that requires collaborative effort between law enforcement agencies, insurance companies, scrap metal dealers, and other involved parties to identify comprehensive solutions.

Therefore, the legislature intends to carefully examine the catalytic converter theft issues in Washington state and conduct a study to make a variety of recommendations to the legislature, including recommendations for a potential pilot program, to reduce the occurrence of catalytic converter theft. The legislature further intends to provide funding for a grant program focused on metal theft and unlawfully obtained metal." [ 2022 c 221 s 1.]

Effective date—2022 c 221: "Except for sections 4 through 7 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 30, 2022]." [ 2022 c 221 s 12.]

PDFRCW 19.290.020

Nonferrous metal property—Records required. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing business in this state shall produce wherever that business is conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving nonferrous metal property. This record must be written in the English language, documented on a standardized form or in electronic form, and contain the following information:

(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;

(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business in the transaction;

(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the seller's government-issued picture identification card; and

(h) A description of the predominant types of nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction, utilizing the institute of scrap recycling industries' generally accepted terminology, and including weight, quantity, or volume.

(2) For every transaction that involves nonferrous metal property, every scrap metal business doing business in the state shall require the person with whom a transaction is being made to sign a declaration. The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record required under subsection (1) of this section, or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following:

"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property."

The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.

(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is conducted for five years following the date of the transaction.

[ 2024 c 301 s 4; 2022 c 221 s 3; 2013 c 322 s 5; 2008 c 233 s 2; 2007 c 377 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.

Findings—Intent—2022 c 221: "The legislature finds that rates of catalytic converter theft have rapidly increased statewide and nationwide, due in part to existing challenges with accurately identifying stolen catalytic converters. The legislature further finds that victims of catalytic converter theft often incur costs that far exceed the monetary value of the catalytic converters themselves. The legislature further finds that catalytic converter theft is a multifaceted issue that requires collaborative effort between law enforcement agencies, insurance companies, scrap metal dealers, and other involved parties to identify comprehensive solutions.

Therefore, the legislature intends to carefully examine the catalytic converter theft issues in Washington state and conduct a study to make a variety of recommendations to the legislature, including recommendations for a potential pilot program, to reduce the occurrence of catalytic converter theft. The legislature further intends to provide funding for a grant program focused on metal theft and unlawfully obtained metal." [ 2022 c 221 s 1.]

Effective date—2022 c 221: "Except for sections 4 through 7 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 30, 2022]." [ 2022 c 221 s 12.]